Mississippi, session 2026, SB2303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Each school district or public charter school shall include the "Meet Baby Olivia" video or a similar high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation that shows every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development for every significant marker of pregnancy until birth, in its science curriculum between Grades 6 and 12.  The purpose of the course material required under this section is to familiarize students with the biological development of a human being at various stages in the womb.  One (1) week before the video is shown, the school shall notify parents and guardians in writing of the showing, and a parent or guardian may, in writing, opt their children out of the showing. (2)  School districts and public charter schools, in complying with this section, shall not violate any provision of the United States Constitution or federal law, the Mississippi Constitution or state law, or any administrative regulations of the United States Department of Education or the State Department of Education. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.